North Carolina, session 2025, HB723.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Article 10 of Chapter 143B of the General Statutes is amended by
adding a new section to read:
"§ 143B-437.84. The North Carolina Technology Coalitions Strategic Support Fund.
(a) Fund; Purposes. – The North Carolina Technology Coalitions Strategic Support Fund
is established as a special fund in the Department of Commerce. The Office of Science,
Technology, and Innovation shall be responsible for administering grants awarded by the
Department from the Fund with oversight from the Board of Science, Technology, and
Innovation. Grants shall be for the purpose of encouraging regional technology-based economic
growth by fostering collaboration throughout a technology coalition and aligning State resource
investment to scale critical and secure supply chains.
(b) Definitions. – The following definitions apply in this section:
(1) Cost match. – Financial or in-kind resources provided through the Fund to a
recipient, defined by a ratio of funding pursued or granted by non-State
sources to that provided by the Fund.
(2) Department. – The Department of Commerce.
(3) Fund. – The North Carolina Technology Coalitions Strategic Support Fund
established in this section.
(4) Office. – The Office of Science, Technology, and Innovation.
(5) Recipient. – An organization supported by the Fund that represents a
technology coalition. Recipients may be an industry alliance, nonprofit
organization, local government, academic institution, or State agency.
(6) Regional area. – Area of service by the technology coalition and the focus of
economic development metric analysis for a technology-based industry
sector. For purposes of the Fund, a regional area must be defined within the
boundaries of the State.
(7) Technology coalition. – A regional network of organizations, such as private
sector, academic, nonprofit, and government institutions, in a network of
formal and informal relationships that contribute to technological and
economic development in a technology-based industry sector, such as (i)
artificial intelligence, (ii) high-performance computing and semiconductors,
(iii) quantum science and technology, (iv) advanced manufacturing, (v)
*H723-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
disaster prevention, (vi) advanced communications technology, (vii)
cybersecurity, (viii) biotechnology, (ix) advanced energy technology, and (x)
material science.
(c) Eligibility. – To be eligible for a grant from the Fund, all of the following conditions
must be met:
(1) The recipient must have its principal place of operation in the State.
(2) The recipient must certify that (i) the grant will be used for allowable purposes
solely within the State and (ii) it will retain its principal place of operation in
the State for as long as it receives grant money from the Fund or the term
required by the Office, whichever is longer.
(3) The recipient applies under oath, to, and on a form prescribed by the Office
that includes all of the following:
a. The name of the business, the form of organization under which it is
operated, and the names and addresses of the principals or
management of the business.
b. A description of how a grant from the Fund will aid the technology
coalition to advance its goals.
c. Justifications for the use of Fund resources for intended economic
impact to a regional area.
d. Any other information necessary for the Office to evaluate the
application.
(4) The recipient does not apply for or receive concurrent funding support from
other sources duplicating the purposes of the Fund.
(5) The recipient uses the grant from the Fund only for the activities listed in the
application and for which the grant was awarded.
(d) Use. – Other than administrative funds retained by the Department in an amount equal
to the greater of (i) one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) or (ii) two percent (2%) of the
appropriation to the Fund for the year, the Department shall award distributions from the Fund
based on strategic and tactical programmatic needs solely for the following:
(1) Coalition infrastructure support, including (i) funding recipients to provide
external support or funding to State agencies or divisions of State agencies to
conduct market and economic analyses; (ii) developing workforce training
programs; (iii) supporting private, foundational, and federal grant
identification and submission; and (iv) sponsoring of technology coalition
knowledge-sharing events.
(2) Coalition cost match allowances to provide financial or in-kind cost matching
to recipients in support of non-State funding, including private, foundational,
and federal funding that drives the economic growth and maturation of a
technology industry in a regional area. The Board of Science, Technology,
and Innovation may (i) set a cap on the cost match amount and the number of
awards per recipient, (ii) require applicants to provide matching funds or
in-kind support for a grant from the Fund, and (iii) provide prioritization in
how the Fund may be used by the recipient.
(e) Administration. – The Department shall develop guidelines related to the
administration of the Fund. At least 20 days before the effective date of any guidelines or
nontechnical amendments to guidelines, the Department must publish the proposed guidelines
on the Department's website and provide notice to persons who have requested notice of proposed
guidelines. In addition, the Department must accept oral and written comments on the proposed
guidelines during the 15 business days beginning on the first day that the Department has
completed these notifications. For purposes of this section, a technical amendment is (i) an
amendment that corrects a spelling or grammatical error or (ii) an amendment that makes a
Page 2 House Bill 723-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
clarification based on public comment and could have been anticipated by the public notice that
immediately preceded the public comment."
SECTION 2. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Commerce the recurring sum of ten million five hundred thousand dollars ($10,500,000) in
nonrecurring funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to be allocated to the North Carolina
Technology Coalitions Strategic Support Fund for purposes consistent with that Fund.
SECTION 3. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
House Bill 723-First Edition Page 3